Utah statutes.
10-5-131.   Uniform accounting and reporting procedures -- Forms --
Instructions.
The state auditor, with the concurrence of the town fiscal committee, shall:
(1)  prescribe uniform accounting and reporting procedures for towns, in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles;
(2)  conduct a continuing review and modification of the procedures to improve
them;
(3)  prepare and supply each town with suitable budget and reporting forms;
and
(4)  prepare instructional materials, conduct training programs and render
other services considered necessary to assist towns in implementing the
uniform accounting, budgeting, and reporting procedures.
